vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Dụng cụ văn phòng > Phụ kiện dụng cũ viết và vẽ: Mực bút đánh dấu và bút dạ quang; Mực và hộp mực; Chì và lõi chì dự trữ của bút chì
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Accessoires de bureau > Accessoires pour instruments d’écriture: Recharges d’encre pour marqueurs et surligneurs; Encre et cartouches pour stylos; Mines et recharges pour crayons
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Kancelářské nástroje > Psací potřeby – příslušenství: Náhradní náplně do fixů a zvýrazňovačů; Inkousty a náplně do per; Tuhy a náplně do tužek
ko: 사무용품 > 사무기구 > 필기/제도 용구: 마커/형광펜 잉크 리필; 펜 잉크/리필심; 샤프심/리필심
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kancelárske nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre písacie a kresliace potreby: Náplne do popisovačov a zvýrazňovačov; Atrament a náplne do pera; Tuha a náplne do ceruziek
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Instrumente de birou > Accesorii pentru instrumente de scris și desen: Rezerve de cerneală pentru marker și evidențiator; Cerneală și rezerve pentru stilouri; Mine de creion și rezerve
nb: Kontormateriell > Kontorinstrumenter > Tilbehør til skrive- og tegneinstrumenter: Blekkerfill til markørpenner og highlightere; Penneblekk og -refiller; Blyantbly og -refiller
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 办公文具 > 书写/绘图工具配件: 记号笔/荧光笔补充墨水替芯; 墨水与笔芯; 铅笔芯
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Biuro instrumentai > Rašymo ir piešimo priemonių priedai: Žymeklių ir paryškinimo rašiklių rašalas papildymui; Rašyklių rašalas ir papildymas; Pieštukų šerdelės ir papildymai
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Instrumentos de escritório > Acessórios para instrumentos de escrita: Refis de tinta para marcadores; Tinta e refil para canetas; Grafite e refil para lapiseiras
en: Office Supplies > Office Instruments > Writing & Drawing Instrument Accessories: Marker & Highlighter Ink Refills; Pen Ink & Refills; Pencil Lead & Refills
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Akcesoria biurowe > Akcesoria do przyborów piśmienniczych i rysunkowych: Tusze do markerów i zakreślaczy; Atramenty i naboje; Wkłady do ołówków automatycznych
it: Forniture per ufficio > Strumenti per ufficio > Accessori strumenti per scrivere: Ricariche d'inchiostro per evidenziatori e pennarelli; Inchiostro penna e ricariche; Portamine e mine
da: Kontorforsyning > Kontorredskaber > Skrive- og tegneredskaber – tilbehør: Fremhævningspenne og highlightere – genpåfyldningsblæk; Kuglepen – blæk og genopfyldning; Blyant – bly og genopfyldning
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Офисные принадлежности > Аксессуары для письменных принадлежностей: Чернила для заправки маркеров и текстовыделителей; Чернила и стержни для ручек; Грифели для карандашей
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Офис инструменти > Аксесоари за инструменти за писане и рисуване: Пълнители с мастило за стандартни и текст маркери; Мастило и пълнители за химикалки; Графити за моливи и пълнители
hu: Irodai kellékek > Irodai eszközök > Író- és rajzeszköz-kiegészítők: Jelölő- és kiemelőtinta-utántöltők; Tolltinta és utántöltők; Ceruzahegy és utántöltők
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Kantoorbenodigdheden > Accessoires voor schrijfinstrumenten: Inktpatronen voor markeerstiften en highlighters; Inkt- en navulpatronen voor pennen; Lood- en navulpatronen voor vulpotloden
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Kontorsinstrument > Tillbehör till skriv- och ritinstrument: Påfyllning till märkpennor och överstrykningspennor; Bläck och patroner till bläckpennor; Blyertsstift
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Όργανα γραφείου > Αξεσουάρ γραφικών & σχεδιαστικών οργάνων: Ανταλλακτικά μελανιών για μαρκαδόρους & υπογραμμιστές; Μελάνια & ανταλλακτικά για στυλό; Μύτες & ανταλλακτικά για μολύβια
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Material de escritório > Acessórios para instrumentos de escrita e desenho: Recargas de tinta para marcadores e sublinhadores; Esferográficas e recargas; Lapiseiras e recargas
es: Material de oficina > Artículos de oficina > Accesorios para escritura y dibujo: Recargas para rotuladores y marcadores; Recambios y tintas; Recambios para portaminas
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pisarniški pripomočki > Dodatki za pisala in risala: Nadomestna polnila za markerje in označevalce besedila; Črnila in nadomestna polnila za pisala; Vložki in nadomestna polnila za svinčnike
ja: オフィス用品 > 事務用品 > 筆記具用インク・替芯: 蛍光ペン用詰替インク; ペン用詰替インク; シャープペンシル替芯
de: Bürobedarf > Büroarbeitsmittel > Schreibwerkzeugzubehör: Marker-Nachfülltinte; Füllertinte & -patronen; Bleistiftminen
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 事務用品 > 書寫/繪畫用具配件: 馬克筆/螢光筆墨水填充物; 墨水/補充墨水; 鉛筆芯/自動筆芯
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > เครื่องมือสำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์การเขียนและการวาด: หมึกเติมสำหรับที่ทำเครื่องหมายและที่ไฮไลต์; หมึกเติมและไส้ปากกา; ไส้ดินสอ
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Uredski uređaji > Dodaci za pribor za pisanje i crtanje: Punjenje za markere i flomastere; Punjenje za nalivpera; Mine za tehničku olovku
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Ofis Aletleri > Yazım ve Çizim Aleti Aksesuarları: Markör ve Vurgulayıcı Mürekkep Refilleri; Kalem Mürekkep ve Refilleri; Kalem Kurşun ve Refilleri
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Toimistovälineet > Kirjoitus- ja piirustusvälineiden lisätarvikkeet: Tussien ja korostuskynien täyttömusteet; Mustekynän muste ja täytepakkaukset; Lyijykynän lyijy täytepakkaukset